chv.twol
Alphabet							
  а ӑ е ё ӗ и о у ӳ ы э ю я б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ь ъ							
  А Ӑ Е Ё Ӗ И О У Ӳ Ы Э Ю Я Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н П Р С Ҫ Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Й Ь Ъ							
 %{A%}:а %{A%}:е							
 %{Ă%}:ӑ %{Ă%}:ӗ %{Ă%}:0							
 %{м%}:м %{м%}:0 %{м%}:н							
 %{н%}:н %{н%}:0							
 %{р%}:р %{р%}:т %{р%}:ч							
 %{ъ%}:0							
 %{ь%}:0							
 %{я%}:0 %{я%}:йӑ %{я%}:йӗ							
 %{э%}:ӑ %{э%}:ӗ %{э%}:0							
 %{У%}:у %{У%}:ю %{У%}:ӳ							
 %{С%}:0							
 %{Н%}:н %{Н%}:0							
 %{Е%}:ӗ %{Е%}:и							
;							
							
							
Sets							
							
BackVow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю ;							
							
FrontVow = е ӗ э и ӳ ;							
							
Vow = ӑ а ы о у я ё ю е ӗ э и ӳ ;							
							
ArchiBack = %{ъ%} ;							
							
Cns = б в г д ж з к л м н п р с ҫ т ф х ц ч ш щ й ъ ;							
							
ArchiCns = %{м%} %{н%} %{р%}  %{С%} ;							
							
							

Rules							
							
"Remove morpheme boundary"							
%>:0 <=> _ ;							
							
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {A}"							
%{A%}:а <=> [ BackVow: | ArchiBack: ] [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{Ă%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;							
							
							
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {Ă}"							
%{Ă%}:ӑ <=> [ BackVow: | ArchiBack: ] [ ArchiCns: | Cns: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{Ă%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;							
        except							
				[ %{м%}: | BackVow: | FrontVow: | %{э%}: | %{я%}: | %{ь%}: | %{У%}: %{Н%}: ] %>: _ [ н | м ] ;			
							
							
"No surface {Ă} in plural genetive  or after a vowel in stem"							
%{Ă%}:0 <=> [ BackVow: | FrontVow: | %{м%}: | %{я%}: | %{э%}: | и й: | %{Н%}: ] [ %{ь%}: ]* %>: _ [ н | м ];							
	except						
		и: [ й: ]* %>: _ м ; !Possessive for шаши, информаци					
							
							
							
"No surface {м} in plural genetive and dative"							
%{м%}:0 <=> _ %>: [ %{н%}: | %{Ă%}: н ] ;							
							
"Surface {м} as н in plural locative and ablative"							
%{м%}:н <=> _ %>: %{р%}: %{A%}: ;							
							
"Surface {р} as т after and  in locative and ablative px2sg"							
 %{р%}:т <=> р %>: _ %{A%}: ;							
		%{У%}: %{Н%}: %>: _ ;				
							
"Remove duplicate consonant in cases"							
Cons:0 <=> Cons _ %>: ;							
!	except						
!			й _ %>: %{У%}: ;				
	where Cons in Cns ;						
													
							
							
"ьӑ"							
я:ьӑ <=> _  %{ь%}: %>: ;							
	except						
		_ %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ; !Женя					
							
"Remove ь before vowel in affix or remove duplicate ь"							
ь:0 <=> _ я: %{ь%}: %>: ; ! Наталья							
	_ %>: [ %{Ă%}: | %{A%}: | %{У%}: ] ;						
	_ е: %{я%}: %>: ; ! платье						
	except						
		_ я: %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ;					
							
"Remove vowel in stem before affix"							
V:0 <=> _ [ %{э%}: | %{я%}: ] %>: ;	
	    _ %>: [ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: | %{Ă%}: р ];
	    _ %{я%}: %>: %{У%}: ;					
		_ %{ь%}: %>: %{У%}: ; !Женя							
	except						
		_  %{я%}:0 %>: ;					
		_ %{я%}: %>: %{У%}: ;					
	where V in Vow ;						
				
							
"No surface {я} in nominative and px1sg after е"							
%{я%}:0 <=> _ #;							
		_ %>: %{У%}: ;					
!	   е: _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ;  !платье						
							
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {я}"							
%{я%}:йӑ <=> BackVow: _ %>: ;							
	except						
		 _ %>: %{У%}: ;					
							
							
"No surface {э} in nominative"							
%{э%}:0 <=> _ # ;							
		_ %>:[ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] ;					
							
"Back vowel harmony for archiphoneme {э}"							
%{э%}:ӑ <=> BackVow: _ %>: ;							
	except						
		 _ %>:[ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ];					
							
"Duplicate consonants in 1-2 syllables in genetive and px1sg/px3sp"							
%{С%}:C <=> C _ [ Vow: ]* %>: [ %{Ă%}: | %{A%}: | %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] ; where C in Cns ;							
							
"Remove surface {н} in affix after a consonant"	!Dative						
%{н%}:0 <=> C: %>: _  ;							
			where C in Cns ;				
							
"Remove surface {й} at the end of the stem after и"							
!Золотницкий							
й:0 <=> и _ %>: ;							
	!	_ %>: %{У%}: ;					
	except 
		и _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ; !px1sg					
		и _ %>: %{У%}: ;					
							
"Add й after и in Possessive 1sg"							
и:ий <=> _ %>: %{Ă%}: м ;							
		! _ %>: %{У%}: ;					
							
"Surface {ч} in dative plural and px3sp abl/loc"							
%{р%}:ч <=> %{м%}: %>: _ ;
	    %{Е%}: %{Н%}: %>: _ ;							
							
"No surface ҫ in nominative"							
!власть							
ҫ:сть <=> _ # ;							
																
							
"Back vowel а, ӑ, о  harmony for archiphoneme {У}"							
%{У%}:у <=> [ а: | ӑ: | о: ] [ Cns: | ArchiCns: | %{э%}: | %>: ]+ _ ;							
	except	
		[ а: | ӑ: | о: ] й: %>: _ ;					
							
"Back vowel я and й  harmony for archiphoneme {У}"							
%{У%}:ю <=>  [ я: | ArchiBack: ] [ %{я%}: | %{ь%}: ]* %>: _ ;							
	    [ а: | ӑ: | о: ] й: %>: _ ;						
							
"{н} in abl/loc affix in px2sg and px3sp"							
 %{Н%}:н <=> [ %{У%}: | %{Е%}: ] _ %>: %{р%}: ;							
							
"Surface {E} as [e] in px3sp"							
%{Е%}:ӗ <=> C: %>: _ ;							
		where C in Cns ;					
